Arkansas, session 2025, SB126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Chancellor 1 $291,247
(2) Chief of Staff 1 $232,104
(3) Project/Program Administrator 28
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
*HAR030*
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(4) Provost 1 $201,301
(5) IT Pool 20
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(6) Vice Chan. for Finance & Administration 1 $194,320
(7) V-C for Res., Innovation & Econ. Devel. 1 $188,485
(8) Vice Chancellor for Student Affairs 1 $188,485
(9) Vice Chan. for Advancement/Development 1 $188,485
(10) Vice Chan. for Enrollment Mgmt 1 $188,484
(11) Dean 7 $173,915
(12) Dean of Graduate Studies 1 $173,914
(13) Dir. of Research & Sponsored Programs 1 $173,466
(14) Director of Counseling 1 $154,803
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
(15) Director of Computer Services 1 $145,572
(16) Director of Corporate Giving 1 $144,269
(17) Director of Facilities Planning 1 $142,891
(18) Director of University Relations 1 $142,888
(19) Director of Physical Plant 1 $142,721
(20) Assistant to the Chancellor 1 $141,997
(21) Associate Vice Chancellor 3 $141,997
(22) Business Affairs Administrator 1 $141,997
(23) Director of International Programs 1 $141,997
(24) Director of Development 2 $141,997
(25) Controller 1 $138,312
(26) Director of Affirmative Action 1 $135,747
(27) Director of Social Work 1 $135,747
(28) Dir. of Alumni and Gov. Relations 1 $133,584
(29) Director of Institutional Research 1 $132,579
(30) Registrar 1 $129,169
(31) Director of Admissions 1 $126,225
(32) Director of Student Financial Aid 1 $126,225
(33) Director of Cooperative Education 1 $124,037
(34) Development/Advancement Manager 1 $121,320
(35) Budget Director 1 $120,948
(36) Director of University Police 1 $120,828
(37) Dean of Students 2 $119,876
(38) Director of Administrative Services 1 $116,274
(39) Assoc. Dean of Students 2 $113,407
(40) Associate Dean 2 $113,407
(41) Assistant Dean 1 $106,740
(42) Dir. of Educational Assessment 1 $106,740
(43) Director of Health Services 1 $106,740
(44) Director of Recruitment 1 $106,740
(45) Student Development Specialist 2 $100,654
(46) Director of Disability Services 1 $98,669
(47) Associate for Administration 2 $93,943
(48) Director of Publications 1 $93,943
(49) Fiscal Support Pool 17
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(50) Public Safety Pool 20
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(51) Asst. Dir. of Continuing Educ. 2 $90,135
(52) Asst. Dir. of Coop. Education 2 $90,135
(53) Director of Materials Management 1 $90,135
(54) Grants Manager 1 $85,136
(55) Personnel Manager 1 $85,136
(56) Television Program Manager 1 $85,136
(57) Public Information Coordinator 1 $81,860
(58) Campus Maintenance Supervisor 3 $78,713
(59) Education Counselor 3 $78,713
(60) Payroll Services Coordinator 1 $78,713
(61) Research Technologist 1 $78,713
(62) Admissions Counselor 3 $77,184
(63) Academic Advisor 5 $77,184
(64) Transfer Coordinator 1 $77,184
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
(65) Skilled Trades Pool 26
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(66) Asst. Dir. Financial Aid 1 $72,774
(67) Budget Specialist 1 $72,774
(68) Human Resources Analyst 1 $72,774
(69) Research Project Analyst 4 $72,774
(70) HEI Program Coordinator 1 $69,975
(71) Print Shop Manager 1 $69,975
(72) Administrative Support Pool 58
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(73) Assistant Registrar 3 $67,284
(74) Financial Aid Analyst 4 $67,284
(75) Library Support Pool 11
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(76) Payroll Services Specialist 1 $67,284
(77) Purchasing Specialist 2 $67,284
(78) Broadcast Production Specialist 1 $64,696
(79) Institutional Printer 2 $64,696
(80) Warehouse Manager 1 $64,696
(81) Financial Aid Specialist 3 $62,208
(82) Human Resources Specialist 2 $62,208
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
(83) Inventory Control Manager 1 $62,208
(84) Student Recruitment Specialist 2 $62,208
(85) Maintenance Specialist 1 $59,815
(86) Research Assistant 2 $59,815
(87) Athletic Facility Supervisor 1 $57,515
(88) Coordinator of Housekeeping 2 $57,515
(89) Storeroom Supervisor 1 $57,515
(90) Human Resources Assistant 1 $55,302
(91) Laboratory Technician 3 $55,302
(92) Institutional Bus Driver 3 $53,175
(93) Research Technician 2 $53,175
(94) Inventory Control Technician 1 $51,130
(95) Maintenance Assistant 14 $51,130
(96) Registrar's Assistant 1 $49,164
(97) Shipping & Receiving Clerk 4 $45,455
(98) Institutional Services Supervisor 4 $43,706
(99) Institutional Services Assistant 27 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(100) Department Chairperson 16 $160,134
(101) Faculty 38
Professor $153,170
Associate Professor $135,750
Assistant Professor $125,303
Instructor $104,389
(102) Director of Library Services 1 $135,750
(103) Research Associate 1 $133,427
(104) Assoc. Director of Library 1 $129,986
(105) Associate Librarian 5 $110,077
(106) Special Instructor 1 $104,389
(107) Assistant Librarian 2 $96,743
(108) Graduate Assistant 2 $34,516
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(109) Faculty 132
Distinguished Professor $161,829
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
Professor $149,687
Associate Professor $132,261
Assistant Professor $121,812
Instructor $100,908
(110) Special Instructor 2 $100,908
(111) Lecturer 2 $75,273
(112) Part-Time Faculty 53 $56,046
(113) Laboratory Assistant 6 $40,163
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(114) Head Coach 7 $195,794
(115) Director of Athletics 1 $159,847
(116) Director of Auxiliary Enterprises 1 $125,549
(117) Assistant Director of Athletics 2 $122,257
(118) Senior Women's Sports Administrator 1 $122,257
(119) Coach 13 $122,241
(120) Athletic Compliance Coordinator 1 $118,867
(121) Assistant Coach 8 $114,807
(122) Head Athletic Trainer 1 $114,806
(123) Business Manager 1 $99,798
(124) Sports Information Director 1 $99,798
(125) Athletic Facility Manager 1 $96,579
(126) Eligibility Specialist 1 $96,579
(127) Registered Nurse 1 $81,860
(128) Education Counselor 3 $78,713
(129) Director of Student Union 1 $75,685
(130) UAPB Director of Housing 1 $75,685
(131) Athletic Ticket Sales Coord. 1 $69,975
(132) HEI Program Coordinator 2 $69,975
(133) Administrative Support Pool 2
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(134) Asst. Director Student Union 1 $67,284
(135) Food Service Pool 1
Food Preparation Manager $64,696
Food Preparation Supervisor $57,515
Food Preparation Coordinator $51,130
Food Preparation Specialist $43,706
Food Preparation Technician $40,409
(136) Licensed Practical Nurse 1 $62,208
(137) Recreation Coordinator 1 $59,815
(138) Resident Hall Specialist 12 $57,515
(139) Athletic Trainer 2 $55,302
(140) Inventory Control Technician 1 $51,130
(141) Mail Services Coordinator 1 $49,164
(142) Mail Services Assistant 2 $45,455
(143) Institutional Services Assistant 5 $42,025
AGRICULTURAL EXPERIMENT STATION
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(144) Dir. of UAPB Agri. Experiment Stat. 1 $173,915
(145) Resident Director 1 $105,621
(146) Administrative Support Pool 6
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(147) Research Assistant 3 $59,815
(148) Landscape Specialist 1 $55,302
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(149) Faculty 37
Distinguished Professor $161,829
Professor $153,172
Associate Professor $135,750
Assistant Professor $125,303
Instructor $104,389
(150) Research Associate 12 $133,427
(151) Research Specialist 7 $106,131
(152) Senior Research Assistant 14 $100,908
(153) Graduate Assistant 33 $57,379
UAPB 1890 EXTENSION PROGRAM
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(154) UAPB 1890 Extension Administrator 1 $173,915
(155) Project/Program Director 2 $135,747
(156) Administrative Support Pool 3
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(157) Extension Faculty 35
Extension Specialist V $242,370
Extension Specialist IV $223,889
Extension Specialist III $191,033
Extension Specialist II $180,763
Extension Specialist I $128,780
Extension Asst. Specialist $113,454
(158) Extension Associate 9 $100,914
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
(159) Multi-County Ext. Agent 5 $59,115
(160) Extension Program Aide 7 $56,247
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 880

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: nine
hundred twenty-four (924) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at
rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff, to be payable from
the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $18,655,782
(02) EXTRA HELP 317,860
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,882,693
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 10,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 575,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CONTINGENCY 1,222,067
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,663,402

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - 1890 EXTENSION PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff, to
be payable from the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff Fund, for personal
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
services and operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff
1890 Extension Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXTENSION PROGRAM PERSONAL SERVICES
AND OPERATING EXPENSES $6,396,701

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff, to be payable from cash funds as
defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating
expenses of the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $16,122,263
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,815,986
(03) OVERTIME 500,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 5,235,857
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 21,273,367
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 776,093
(C) PROF. FEES 4,440,232
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 4,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 36,000,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 2,602,223
(08) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 20,000
(09) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 113,499
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $92,899,520

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. JENKINS
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
CENTER. Of the funds appropriated in the State Operations appropriation
section, the sum of $252,558 for the fiscal year shall be used to provide
support to the Jenkins Center in Pine Bluff. Provided, however, such funds
shall be used to conduct and maintain a University training program in
cooperation with the Jenkins Center. Provided, further, any reductions in
funding for appropriation provided in the State Operations appropriation
section shall be proportionately applied to the funds set out herein for
support.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 7. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030

SB126
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






























01/27/2025 1:52:14 PM HAR030